North Dakota statutes. TITLE 64 Weights, Measures, and Grades
CHAPTER 64-04 Standards and Weights of Liquefied Petroleum Gas

64-04-01.
Restrictions upon sale of liquefied petroleum gas.

It is unlawful to sell or offer for sale, either at wholesale or retail, any liquefied petroleum gas, either in liquid or vapor form, except by avoirdupois weight, specified in pounds; liquid measure, specified in gallons; vapor measure, specified in cubic feet; or specified in such other units approved by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 414, § 1; 1989, ch. 764, § 26.

64-04-02.
Authority of commission to test and condemn weighing and measuring devices.

The commission may test or calibrate weighing and measuring devices used in the retail sale of liquefied petroleum gas, either in liquid or vapor form, and shall condemn all devices found not to be within the permitted tolerance or which do not clearly state the quantity of liquefied petroleum gas, either in liquid or vapor form, in pounds, gallons, cubic feet, or other units approved by the commission. The commission shall conspicuously mark all condemned devices, which mark may not be removed or defaced except upon authorization of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 414, § 2; 1989, ch. 764, § 27.

64-04-03.
Specification of liquid gas meters.

All liquid gas meters must be of a positive displacement type equipped with a vapor separator or provided with other equipment which will positively eliminate all air and vapor from passing through the meter with the liquid gas, and a differential pressure regulator. The meters must be corrected, prior to use, to sixty degrees Fahrenheit [15.5 degrees Celsius] liquid gas temperature and all deliveries of liquid gas through such meters must, at the time and place of delivery, be temperature-corrected to sixty degrees Fahrenheit [15.5 degrees Celsius] and the customer billed accordingly. It is unlawful to make retail sales to customers except where delivered through a fuel dispenser from any bulk delivery vehicle unless such bulk delivery vehicle is equipped with and dispenses said liquid petroleum gas through a liquid meter as herein provided. Liquid meters may not be equipped with a bypass around the liquid meter. The prohibition of a bypass does not prohibit the use of an equalization line.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 414, § 3; 1989, ch. 764, § 28.

64-04-04.
Commission rules — Tolerances.

The commission may adopt rules and establish tolerances within a maximum of two percent having the force or effect of law.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 414, § 4; 1989, ch. 764, § 29.

64-04-05.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or of the commission rules is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 414, § 5; 1975, ch. 106, § 667; 1989, ch. 764, § 30.